California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(l) (1) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement and administer the changes made to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) by the act that added this subdivision by all-county letters, bulletins, or similar written instructions until rules and regulations are adopted or revised.

(2) The department shall initiate a rulemaking action to adopt regulations to implement this subdivision no later than July 1, 2030.

(m) Public funds shall not be paid directly or indirectly to an agency that does not pay at least the minimum wage to each of its employees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 25, Sec. 29.   (AB 150)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10271.5.

(a) For purposes of establishing initial income eligibility for services under this chapter, “income eligible” means that a family’s adjusted monthly income is at or below 85 percent of the state median income, adjusted for family size, as specified in subdivision (c).

(b) For purposes of establishing ongoing income eligibility under this chapter, “ongoing income eligible” means that a family’s adjusted monthly income is at or below 85 percent of the state median income, adjusted for family size, as specified in subdivision (c).

(c) The Department of Finance shall calculate the state median income for family sizes of one to four, inclusive, by using the most recent census data available on state
 median family income in the past 12 months by family size. The Department of Finance shall calculate the state median income for family sizes of five and above by using the most recent census data for a family of four and multiplying this number by the ratios for the appropriate family size used in the federal Low-Income Home Energy Assistance Program (42 U.S.C. Sec. 8621 et seq.) and specified in federal regulations at paragraphs (5), (6), and (7) of subdivision (b) of Section 96.85 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The Department of Finance shall update its calculations of the state median income for families according to the methodology provided in this subdivision and provide the updated data to the department no later than March 1 of each fiscal year.

(d) The income of a recipient of federal supplemental security income benefits pursuant to Title XVI of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1381 et seq.) and state
 supplemental program benefits pursuant to Title XVI of the federal Social Security Act and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000) of Part 3 shall not be included as income for purposes of determining eligibility for childcare under this chapter.

(e) Payments made on behalf of a child pursuant to Section 11460, 11461.3, 11461.36, or 11461.4 shall not be included as income for purposes of determining eligibility for childcare under this chapter.

(f) Notwithstanding any other law, guaranteed income payments received by an individual shall not be included as income for purposes of determining eligibility for childcare under this chapter. For purposes of this subdivision, “guaranteed income payments” are defined as unconditional, recurring, regular cash payments, whether publicly or privately funded, that are intended to support the basic needs of eligible recipients, including, but
 not limited to, payments provided through pilot programs and projects receiving funding from the California Guaranteed Income Pilot Program (Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 18997) of Part 6).

(g) (1) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement and administer subdivisions (e) and (f) by all-county letters, bulletins, or similar written instructions until regulations are adopted.

(2) The department shall adopt regulations implementing subdivisions (e) and (f) no later than July 1, 2025.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 571, Sec. 47.   (AB 185)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10271.6.

(a) To calculate a family’s adjusted monthly income for purposes of determining income eligibility or calculating a family fee, the calculation shall be done by the use of an income calculation worksheet, and in accordance with subdivisions (b) and (c).

(b) When a family’s income is regular and steady, the adjusted monthly income shall be determined by the use of an income calculation worksheet that specifies all of the following:

(1) The frequency of the pay periods.

(2) The gross amount of the payroll check stubs.

(3) All other sources of
 countable income to determine the adjusted monthly income, as defined in Section 18078 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, as any of the following:

(A) Weekly for 52 pay periods.

(B) Every two weeks for 26 pay periods.

(C) Twice monthly for 24 pay periods.

(D) Monthly for 12 pay periods.

(c) When a family experiences income fluctuation, as defined in Section 18078 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, a family may choose to provide up to the 12 preceding months of income information as necessary for purposes of determining income eligibility or calculating a family fee. The adjusted monthly income shall be determined by averaging the total countable income from at
 least two months, as applicable based on the income provided, to determine average adjusted monthly income for purposes of determining income eligibility or calculating a family fee.

(d) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement and administer this section by all-county letters, bulletins, or similar written instructions until regulations are adopted. The department shall adopt regulations implementing this section no later than July 1, 2026.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 41, Sec. 14.   (AB 116)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

10271.7.

(a) For purposes of establishing eligibility for services under this part, “a member of the household who is certified to receive benefits from Medi-Cal, CalFresh, the California Food Assistance Program, the California Special Supplemental Nutrition Program for Women, Infants, and Children, the federal Food Distribution Program on Indian Reservations, Head Start, Early Head Start, or any other designated means-tested government program, as determined by the department” means either of the following:

(1) A member of the household has been certified as eligible to receive benefits or services in any of those programs. The family shall provide documentation of
 current enrollment in the program, unless the contracting agency has, and elects to use, other means of obtaining verification of that enrollment.

(2) A contracting agency has determined a member of the household is eligible for Head Start or Early Head Start services.

(b) Families qualifying for eligibility under clause (v) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 10271 shall have the income declared on the application for the means-tested government program as its income for the purposes of prioritizing enrollment and calculating family fees.

(c) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provision of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of
 Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement and administer this section through the issuance of guidance or other written directives.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 923, Sec. 7.   (SB 1047)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10272.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, effective July 1, 2011, the department shall reduce the maximum reimbursable amounts of the contracts for the Preschool Education Program, the General Child Care Program, the Migrant Day Care Program, the Alternative Payment Program, the CalWORKs Stage 3 Program, and the Allowance for Disabled Program by 11 percent or by whatever proportion is necessary to ensure that expenditures for these programs do not exceed the amounts appropriated for them, including any reductions made subsequent to the adoption of the annual Budget Act. The department may consider the contractor’s performance or whether the contractor serves children in underserved areas as defined in subdivision (ag) of Section 10213.5 when
 determining contract reductions, provided that the aggregate reduction to each program specified in this subdivision is 11 percent or by whatever proportion is necessary to ensure that expenditures for these programs do not exceed the amounts appropriated for them, including any reductions made subsequent to the adoption of the annual Budget Act.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, effective July 1, 2011, families shall be disenrolled from subsidized childcare services, consistent with the priorities for services specified in subdivision (b) of Section 10271. Families shall be disenrolled in the following order:

(1) Families whose income exceeds 85 percent of the state median income (SMI) adjusted for family size, except for families whose children are receiving child protective services or are at risk of being neglected or abused.

(2) Families with the highest income below 85 percent of the SMI, in relation to family size.

(3) Families that have the same income and have been enrolled in childcare services the longest.

(4) Families that have the same income and have a child with exceptional needs.

(5) Families whose children are receiving child protective services or are at risk of being neglected or abused, regardless of family income.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 234, Sec. 2.   (SB 792)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10272.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, and in addition to any reductions applied pursuant to Section 10272, effective July 1, 2012, the department shall reduce the maximum reimbursable amounts of the contracts for the General Child Care Program, the Migrant Day Care Program, the Alternative Payment Program, the CalWORKs Stage 3 Program, and the Allowance for Disabled Program by 8.7 percent or by whatever proportion is necessary to ensure that expenditures for these programs do not exceed the amounts appropriated for them, as adjusted for any reductions in appropriations made subsequent to the adoption of the annual Budget Act. The department may consider the contractor’s performance or whether the contractor serves children in underserved areas as defined in subdivision (ag) of Section 10213.5 when
 determining contract reductions, provided that the aggregate reduction to each program specified in this subdivision is 8.7 percent or whatever proportion is necessary to ensure that expenditures for these programs do not exceed the amounts appropriated for them, as adjusted for any reductions in appropriations made subsequent to the adoption of the annual Budget Act.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, effective July 1, 2012, families shall be disenrolled from subsidized child care services, consistent with the priorities for services specified in subdivision (b) of Section 10271. Families shall be disenrolled in the following order:

(1) Families with the highest income in relation to family size.

(2) Families that have the same income and have been enrolled in child care services the longest.

(3) Families that have the same income and have a child with exceptional needs.

(4) Families whose children are receiving child protective services or are at risk of being neglected or abused, regardless of family income.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10273.

(a) The preferred placement for children who are 11 or 12 years of age and who are otherwise eligible for subsidized child care and development services shall be in a before or after school program.

(b) Children who are 11 or 12 years of age shall be eligible for subsidized child care services only for the portion of care needed that is not available in a before or after school program provided pursuant to Article 22.5 (commencing with Section 8482) of, or Article 22.6 (commencing with Section 8484.7) of, Chapter 2 of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code. Contractors shall provide each family of an eligible 11 or 12 year old with the option of combining care provided in a before or after school program with subsidized
 child care in another setting, for those hours within a day when the before or after school program does not operate, in order to meet the child care needs of the family.

(c) Children who are 11 or 12 years of age, who are eligible for and who are receiving subsidized child care services, and for whom a before or after school program is not available, shall continue to receive subsidized child care services.

(d) If an 11 or 12-year-old child who is enrolled in a subsidized child development program becomes ineligible for subsidized child care under subdivision (b) and is disenrolled from the before or after school program, or if the before or after school program no longer meets the child care needs of the family, the child shall be given priority to return to the subsidized child care services upon the parent’s notification of the contractor of the need for child care.

(e) This section does not apply to an 11 or 12 year old child with a disability, including a child with exceptional needs who has an individualized education program as required by the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794), or Part 30 (commencing with Section 56000) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code.

(f) The savings generated each contract year by the implementation of the changes made to this section by the act amending this section during the 2005–06 Regular Session shall remain with each alternative payment program, child development center, or other contractor for the provision of child care services, except for care provided by programs pursuant to Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 10370).

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10273.5.

By July 1, 1981, and annually thereafter, the State Department of Health Care Services shall provide a mechanism for the delivery of health screening and followup services for children enrolled in child care and development programs for whom there are no appropriate health services accessible by referral.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10274.

The department may waive or modify child development requirements in order to enable child development programs to serve combinations of eligible children in areas of low population. The child development programs for which the department may grant waivers shall include, but need not be limited to, migrant child care and development programs and general child care and development programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10274.5.

The department may provide outreach services and technical assistance to new child care contracting agencies and to those providing child care during nontraditional times, in underserved geographic areas, and for children with special child care needs, including infants and toddlers under three years of age.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10275.

(a) The department shall establish rules and regulations for the staffing of all center-based child care and development programs under contract with the department.

(1) Priority shall be given by the department to the employment of persons in child development programs with ethnic backgrounds which are similar to those of the child for whom child development services are provided.

(2) For purposes of staffing child care and development programs, the role of a teacher in child supervision means direct supervision of the children as well as supervision of aides and groups of children.

(3) Family child care homes
 shall operate pursuant to adult/child ratios prescribed in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 86001) of Division 6 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(b) Approval by the department of any ongoing or new programs seeking to operate under the ratios and standards established by the department under this chapter shall be based upon the following considerations:

(1) The type of facility in which care is being or is to be provided.

(2) The ability of the department to implement a funding source change.

(3) The proportion of nonsubsidized children enrolled or to be enrolled by the agency.

(4) The most cost-effective ratios possible for the type of services provided or to be
 provided by the agency.

(c) The department shall apply for waivers of federal requirements as are necessary to carry out this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10275.5.

Until the department promulgates regulations for center-based programs establishing staffing ratios, the following staffing ratios shall apply:

(a) Infants, 0 to 2 years old—1:3 adult-child ratio, 1:18 teacher-child ratio.

(b) Infants and toddlers, 0 to 2 years old—1:4 adult-child ratio, 1:16 teacher-child ratio.

(c) Children 3 to 6 years old—1:8 adult-child ratio, 1:24 teacher-child ratio.

(d) Children 6 to 10 years old—1:14 adult-child ratio, 1:28 teacher-child ratio.

(e) Children 10 to 13 years
 old—1:18 adult-child ratio, 1:36 teacher-child ratio.

(f) If groups of children of varying ages are commingled, the teacher and adult ratios shall be proportionate and appropriate to the ages and groups of children.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10276.

(a) A child care and development program funded pursuant to the federal Child Care and Development Fund, as defined in Section 98.2 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, shall provide notice to a childcare provider of a change in reimbursement amounts for childcare services, a change in the hours of care, rates, or schedules, an increase or decrease in parent fees, a termination of services, including, but not limited to, a family’s change in provider, or any changes to the family’s eligibility status that may impact payment. For purposes of this section, the notice shall occur either electronically, if requested
 by the childcare provider, or via the United States Postal Service. The program shall send the notice, as well as the effective date of any change described in this subdivision, no later than the day the program becomes aware that the change will occur.

(b) The notification shall not be deemed a violation of the parent’s confidentiality, but as a method to ensure the proper administration of subsidy funds.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement and administer this section by all-county letter or similar directive until regulations are adopted.

(2) The department shall adopt emergency regulations implementing this
 section no later than July 1, 2026. The department may readopt any emergency regulation authorized by this section that is the same as, or substantially equivalent to, any emergency regulation previously adopted pursuant to this section. The initial adoption of regulations pursuant to this section and one readoption of emergency regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare. Initial emergency regulations and one readoption of emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be exempt from review by the Office of Administrative Law. The initial emergency regulations and the one readoption of emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be submitted to the Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State, and each shall remain in effect for no more than 180 days, by which time final regulations shall be adopted.

(d) This section shall become operative on September 1, 2022.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 62, Sec. 23.   (AB 210)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Operative September 1, 2022, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

10277.

(a) On or before March 1, 2024, each county and contractor that reimburses childcare providers for the provision of state-funded subsidized childcare and development services shall develop, implement, and publish a plan for timely payment to childcare providers. The plan shall include all of the following:

(1) A provision requiring that, in accordance with Section 98.45 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, childcare providers shall be paid within 21 calendar days of the submission of either of the following:

(A) A complete monthly attendance record or invoice, as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 10227.5, for providers accepting subsidy vouchers.

(B) Daily sign-in and sign-out sheets, as referenced in Section 18065 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, for providers participating in a family childcare home education network.

(2) A schedule for the payment of services that shall be signed by the childcare provider.

(3) A provision requiring that if a provider submits attendance records or invoices for multiple children and not all individual records or invoices within the submission include adequate information to provide a payment, payments shall not be withheld for those records or invoices that include adequate information to provide a payment.

(4) Procedures that establish clear processes and timelines to resolve overpayment and underpayment issues, which shall include provider
 written consent to recover any overpayment.

(5) A provision that if a county or contractor is unable to issue reimbursement payments within 21 calendar days pursuant to the requirement specified in paragraph (1) due to extenuating circumstances, including, but not limited to, an emergency or payment system malfunction, the impacted provider shall be notified within a reasonable timeframe of the county or contractor becoming aware of the circumstance causing the delay of reimbursement payment.

(b) Counties and contractors shall publish the plans developed pursuant to this section for childcare providers to access and reference. The plans shall be published in documents available to providers, such as provider handbooks and individual provider agreements, as appropriate.

(c) The department shall support counties and
 contractors with the development and implementation of the plans prepared pursuant to this section and in compliance with the requirement for timely payments. If the department becomes aware that a county or contractor is not complying with the requirements of this section, the department may issue a finding of noncompliance, and the county or contractor may be subject to corrective action.

(d) A childcare provider may submit a monthly attendance record or invoice, as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 10227.5, without a parent’s signature when the parent has not communicated with the provider for a minimum of seven consecutive days, the provider has notified the county or contractor of the parent’s lack of communication in accordance with Section 18066.5 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, and the county or contractor has documented the provider’s unsuccessful attempts to collect a signature.

(e) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement and administer this section by all-county letters, bulletins, or similar written instructions until regulations are adopted.

(f) The department shall initiate a rulemaking action to adopt regulations implementing this section no later than July 1, 2026.

(g) If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Section 10426, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if such provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become
 effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 193, Sec. 9.   (SB 140)   Effective September 13, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10277.1.

(a) Funding shall be allocated to the State Department of Social Services from funds in Schedule (3) of Item 5180-101-0001 of the Budget Act of 2023 and the Budget Act of 2025 and to the State Department of Education from funds specified in Schedule (1) of Item 6100-194-0001 and Schedule (1) of 6100-196-0001 of the Budget Act of 2023, the Budget Act of 2024, and the Budget Act of 2025 to provide a once-per-month, per-child-served who is enrolled in subsidized childcare cost of care plus rate.

(b) (1) Of the funding described in subdivision (a), the Legislature hereby allocates funds to the State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Education to provide family childcare providers with the monthly cost of care plus rate
 commencing January 1, 2024, and
 to June 30, 2025, inclusive. The amount per child shall range between ninety-eight dollars ($98) and two hundred eleven dollars ($211) per month to be determined based on the family childcare provider type and the region in which the family childcare provider is located pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (3). The state shall provide the amount of the monthly costs of care plus rate for all family childcare providers serving children described in this paragraph based on the number of subsidized children enrolled. This monthly rate shall be issued to family childcare providers based on monthly child enrollments for subsidized childcare and development and state preschool programs.

(2) Per child rate amounts shall
 be as follows:

(A) For family childcare providers in the central region, ninety-eight dollars ($98) per each license-exempt family childcare provider, and one hundred forty dollars ($140) per each licensed family childcare provider.

(B) For family childcare providers in the northern region, ninety-nine dollars ($99) per each license-exempt family childcare provider, and one hundred forty-one dollars ($141) per each licensed family childcare provider.

(C) For family childcare providers in the southern region, one hundred twelve dollars ($112) per each license-exempt family childcare provider, and one hundred sixty dollars ($160) per each licensed family childcare provider.

(D) For family childcare providers in the Los Angeles region, one hundred nineteen
 dollars ($119) per each license-exempt family childcare provider, and one hundred seventy-one dollars ($171) per each licensed family childcare provider.

(E) For family childcare providers in the bay area region, one hundred forty-eight dollars ($148) per each license-exempt family childcare provider, and two hundred eleven dollars ($211) per each licensed family childcare provider.

(3) Regions are defined as follows:

(A) The central region includes the Counties of Fresno, Inyo, Kern, Kings, Madera, Mariposa, Merced, Monterey, Sacramento, San Benito, San Joaquin, San Luis Obispo, Stanislaus, and Tulare.

(B) The northern region includes the Counties of Alpine, Amador, Butte, Calaveras, Colusa, Del Norte, El Dorado, Glenn, Humboldt, Lake, Lassen,
 Mendocino, Modoc, Mono, Nevada, Placer, Plumas, Shasta, Sierra, Siskiyou, Sutter, Tehama, Trinity, Tuolumne, Yolo, and Yuba.

(C) The southern region includes the Counties of Imperial, Orange, Riverside, San Bernardino, San Diego, Santa Barbara, and Ventura.

(D) The Los Angeles region includes the County of Los Angeles only.

(E) The bay area region includes the Counties of Alameda, Contra Costa, Marin, Napa, San Francisco, San Mateo, Santa Clara, Santa Cruz, Solano, and Sonoma.

(c) (1) Funding shall be allocated to the State Department of Social Services from funds in Schedule (3) of Item 5180-101-0001 of the Budget Act of 2025 and to the State Department of Education from funds specified in
 Schedule (1) of Item 6100-194-0001 and Schedule (1) of 6100-196-0001 of the Budget Act of 2023, the Budget Act of 2024, and the Budget Act of 2025 to provide a once-per-month, per-child-served who is enrolled in subsidized childcare cost of care plus rate.

(2) (A) Of the funding described in paragraph (1), the Legislature hereby allocates funds to the State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Education to provide family childcare providers with the monthly cost of care plus rate commencing July 1, 2025, and through June 30, 2026, inclusive. Commencing July 1, 2026, the monthly cost of care plus rates shall continue. The amount per child shall be equal to the amounts
 described in subdivision (b) increased by the percentage calculated in clause (iii) of subparagraph (B). The state shall provide the amount of the monthly costs of care plus rate for all family childcare providers serving children described in this paragraph based on the number of subsidized children enrolled. This monthly rate shall be issued to family childcare providers based on monthly child enrollments for subsidized childcare and development and state preschool programs.

(B) The Department of Finance shall make the following calculations based on data provided by the State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Education:

(i) The total cost of providing the statutory cost of living adjustment for childcare programs and State Preschool programs operated by nonlocal educational agencies in the 2025–26 fiscal year pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 10280
 of this code and paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 42238.15 of the Education Code. These programs include alternative payment programs, including migrant alternative payment programs pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 10225), migrant childcare and development programs pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 10235), general childcare and development programs pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 10240), family childcare home education networks pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 10250), and childcare and development services for children with special needs pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 10260) of this part, and the California state preschool program pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8200) of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code, and exclude state preschool programs operated by local educational agencies.

(ii) The estimated cost of providing the monthly
 cost of care plus rates described in subdivision (b) of this section and subdivision (b) of Section 10277.2 in the 2025–26 fiscal year, excluding costs for state preschool programs operated by local educational agencies, based on the estimates of child enrollment in 2025–26 provided by the State Department of Social Services and State Department of Education, respectively.

(iii) Divide the amount calculated in clause (i) by the amount calculated in clause (ii).

(C) Family childcare provides shall be paid the increase calculated in clause (iii) of subparagraph (B), per child, for each month or partial month occurring between July 1, 2025, and December 30, 2025, inclusive, as a one-time payment. The one-time payment shall be applicable to all family childcare providers who were reimbursed for
 subsidized childcare and development or state preschool program services in the month of April 2025, based on enrollment numbers for that month.

(D) (i) The payment described in subparagraph (C) is due to providers by January 1, 2026, contingent upon full ratification by September 30, 2025, of the tentative agreement reached between the State of California and the Child Care Providers United - California on August 7, 2025.

(ii) If full ratification of the tentative agreement reached between the State of California and the Child Care Providers United - California on August 7, 2025, is not achieved by September 30, 2025, providers shall receive an increase to the one-time payment described in subparagraph (C), and the January 1, 2026, deadline described
 in clause (i) shall not apply. If the payment is not made to providers by January 1, 2026, the following per-child amounts shall be added to the one-time payment described in subparagraph (C) for each additional month or partial month, occurring after January 1, 2026, for which providers have not received the payment described in subparagraph (C):

(I) For family childcare providers in the central region, twelve dollars ($12) per child, per each licensed family childcare provider, and nine dollars ($9) per child, per each license-exempt family childcare provider.

(II) For family childcare providers in the northern region, thirteen dollars ($13) per child, per each licensed family childcare provider, and nine dollars ($9) per child, per each license-exempt family childcare provider.

(III) For family childcare providers
 in the southern region, fourteen dollars ($14) per child, per each licensed family childcare provider, and ten dollars ($10) per child, per each license-exempt family childcare provider.

(IV) For family childcare providers in the Los Angeles region, fifteen dollars ($15) per child, per each licensed family childcare provider, and eleven dollars ($11) per child, per each license-exempt family childcare provider.

(V) For family childcare providers in the bay area region, nineteen dollars ($19) per child, per each licensed family childcare provider, and thirteen dollars ($13) per child, per each license-exempt family childcare provider.

(E) Commencing January 1, 2026, or the date that the one-time payment
 described in subparagraph (C) is made to family childcare providers, whichever is later, providers shall receive the increased monthly cost of care plus rate calculated pursuant to subparagraphs (A) and (B) as a per-child monthly payment. The per-child monthly rate calculated pursuant to subparagraphs (A) and (B) shall range between one hundred seven dollars ($107) and two hundred thirty dollars ($230). Per-child amounts shall be as follows:

(i) For family childcare providers in the central region, one hundred seven dollars ($107) per each license-exempt family childcare provider, and one hundred fifty-two dollars ($152) per each licensed family childcare provider.

(ii) For family childcare providers in the northern region, one hundred eight dollars ($108) per each
 license-exempt family childcare provider, and one hundred fifty-four dollars ($154) per each licensed family childcare provider.

(iii) For family childcare providers in the southern region, one hundred twenty-two dollars ($122) per each license-exempt family childcare provider, and one hundred seventy-four dollars ($174) per each licensed family childcare provider.

(iv) For family childcare providers in the Los Angeles region, one hundred thirty dollars ($130) per each license-exempt family childcare provider, and one hundred eighty-six dollars ($186) per each licensed family childcare provider.

(v) For family childcare providers in the bay area region, one hundred sixty-one dollars ($161) per each license-exempt family childcare provider, and two hundred thirty dollars ($230) per each licensed family childcare
 provider.

(F) The regions described in this paragraph are the same as those defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b).

(d) (1) The State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Education
 shall
 provide family childcare providers with a one-time stabilization payment. This payment is due to providers no later than January 1, 2026, contingent upon full ratification by September 30, 2025, of the tentative agreement reached between the State of California and the Child Care Providers United - California on August 7, 2025. If full ratification is not reached by September 30, 2025, the January 1, 2026 deadline shall not apply. The payment amounts shall be
 per-child-served who is enrolled in subsidized childcare,
 pursuant to paragraph (2). The one-time, per-child stabilization payment shall be applicable to all family childcare providers who were reimbursed for subsidized childcare and development or state preschool program services in the month of April 2025, based on enrollment numbers for that month.

(2) One-time, per-child stabilization payment
 amounts shall be
 as follows:

(A) Three hundred dollars ($300) for license-exempt family childcare providers.

(B) Four hundred thirty-one dollars ($431) for family childcare providers licensed
 to operate a
 family daycare home, as defined in subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 1596.78 of the Health and Safety Code.

(e) The monthly reimbursement rate and the one-time, per-child stabilization payment described in this section shall be payable to family childcare providers operating or serving programs pursuant to
 Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 10225) of, Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 10235) of, Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 10240) of, Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 10250) of, Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 10260) of, or Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 10370) of, Part 1.8 of Division 9 of this code, or the Emergency Child Care Bridge Program for Foster Children pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11461.6) of Part 2 of this code, or Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8200) of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code.

(f) In addition to the monthly rates and one-time, per-child stabilization payments described in this section, the State Department of Education and the State Department of Social Services shall
 provide state preschool programs, alternative payment and direct contract programs, or any other agency designated to distribute payments to these providers with a 10-percent administrative fee for processing the monthly rates and a 5-percent administrative fee for processing the one-time payments described in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) and the one-time, per-child stabilization payments. For payments provided after June 30, 2025, the 10-percent administrative fee for processing the monthly rates shall only apply to the monthly rate amounts specified in subdivision (b).

(g) The State Department of Education shall allocate funding to California state preschool contracting agencies for distribution of rates and payments pursuant to this section to the family childcare providers participating in a state preschool